Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.270

Supplementary budget.

In the event that additional funds are needed for the operation of a county hospital or infirmary, the county legislative authority shall have authority to adopt a supplemental budget. Such supplemental budget shall set forth the amount and sources of funds and the items of expenditure involved.

[ 1984 c 26 s 21; 1971 ex.s. c 277 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.270. Prior: 1951 c 256 s 3.]